Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 8
WASTE MANAGEMENT

Article 1

General Provisions.

Article 2

Solid Waste Management.

Part 1

G

ENERAL PROVISIONS

.

Part 2

R

EGIONAL SOLID WASTE MANAGEMENT AUTHORITIES

.

Article 3

Hazardous Waste.

Part 1

H

AZARDOUS WASTE MANAGEMENT

.

Part 2

H

AZARDOUS SITE RESPONSE

.

Part 3

G

EORGIA VOLUNTARY REMEDIATION PROGRAM

.

Article 4

[Repealed].

Article 5

Southeast Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Management Compact.

Article 6

Mitigating Effect of Hazardous Materials Discharge.

Article 7

Product Packaging.

Article 8

Pollution Prevention Assistance Division.

Article 9

Georgia Brownfield Program.

Cross references.

- Waste control, T. 16, C. 7, A. 2, P. 3.

Establishment of public authorities for recovery and utilization of resources contained in sewage sludge and solid waste, T. 36, C. 63.

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Recent Developments in Georgia Solid Waste Law Pile Up," see 28 Ga. St. B.J. 182 (1992). For annual survey article on local government law, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (1998).